Mississippi, session 2026, HB417.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-29-113, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-29-113. SCHEDULE I (a)  Schedule I consists of the drugs and other substances, by whatever official name, common or usual name, chemical name, or brand name designated, that is listed in this section. (b)  Opiates.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opiates, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts and salts of isomers, esters and ethers, whenever the existence of these isomers, esters, ethers and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Acetyl-alpha-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(1-methyl-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylacetamide); (2)  Acetylmethadol; (3)  Acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (4)  Acryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacrylamide), also known as acryloylfentanyl; (5)  AH-7921 (3,4-dichloro-N-[(1-dimethylamino) cyclohexylmethyl]benzamide); (6)  Allylprodine; (7) Alphacetylmethadol, except levo-alphacetylmethadol (levo-alpha-acetylmethadol, levomethadyl acetate, or LAAM); (8)  Alphameprodine; (9)  Alphamethadol; (10)  Alpha′-methyl butyryl fentanyl (2-methyl-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); (11)  Alpha-Methylfentanyl (N-[1-alpha-methyl-beta-phenyl)ethyl-4-piperidyl]propionanilide; 1-(1-methyl-2-phenylethyl)-4-(N-propanilido)piperidine); (12)  Alpha-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[1-methyl-2-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (13)  Benzethidine; (14) Betacetylmethadol; (15)  Beta-Hydroxyfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (16)  Beta-Hydroxy-3-methylfentanyl (N-[1-(2-hydroxy-2-phenylethyl)-3-methyl-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (17)  Beta-Hydroxythiofentanyl (N-[1-[2-hydroxy-2-(thiophen-2-yl)ethyl]piperidin-4-yl]-N-phenylpropionamide); (18)  Betameprodine; (19)  Betamethadol; (20)  Beta-Methyl fentanyl (N-phenyl-N-(1-(2-phenylpropyl)piperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as β-methyl fentanyl; (21)  Beta'-Phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N,3-diphenylpropanamide), also known as β'-phenyl fentanyl or 3-phenylpropanoyl fentanyl; (22)  Betaprodine; (23)  Brorphine (1(1(1(4-bromophenyl)ethyl)piperidin-4yl)1,3-dihydro-2H-benzo[d]imidazol-2-one); (24)  Butyrl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutyramide); (25)  Clonitazene; (26)  Crotonyl fentanyl ((E)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbut-2-enamide); (27)  Cyclopentyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopentanecarboxamide); (28)  Cyclopropyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylcyclopropanecarboxamide); (29)  Dextromoramide; (30)  Diampromide; (31) Diethylthiambutene; (32)  Difenoxin; (33)  Dimenoxadol; (34)  Dimepheptanol; (35)  2′,5′-dimethoxyfentanyl (N-1-2,5-dimethoxyphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpropionamide); (36)  Dimethylthiambutene; (37)  Dioxaphetyl butyrate; (38)  Dipipanone; (39) Ethylmethylthiambutene; (40)  Etodesnitazene (2-2-4-ethoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine, also known as etazene; (41)  Etonitazene; (42)  Etoxeridine; (43)  Fentanyl carbamate (ethyl(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)(phenyl)carbamate); (44)  Fentanyl-related substances, meaning any substance not otherwise listed under another schedule and for which no exemption or approval is in effect under Section 505 of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act [21 USC 355] that is structurally related to fentanyl by one or more of the following modifications: (A)  Replacement of the phenyl portion of the phenethyl group by any monocycle, whether or not further substituted in or on the monocycle; (B)  Substitution in or on the phenethyl group with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; (C)  Substitution in or on the piperidine ring with alkyl, alkenyl, alkoxyl, ester, ether, hydroxyl, halo, haloalkyl, amino or nitro groups; (D)  Replacement of the aniline ring with any aromatic monocycle whether or not further substituted in or on the aromatic monocycle; and/or (E)  Replacement of the N-propionyl group by another acyl group. (45)  4-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide), also known as para-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl); (46)  2'-Fluoro ortho-fluorofentanyl (N-(1-(2-fluorophenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-(2-fluorophenyl) propionamide), also known as 2'-fluoro 2-fluorofentanyl; (47)  Furanyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-2-carboxamide); (48)  3-furanyl fentanyl (N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylfuran-3-carboxamide); (49)  Furethidine; (50)  Hydroxypethidine; (51)  Isobutyryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylisobutyramide); (52)  Isotonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4 isopropoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine); (53)  Isovaleryl fentanyl (3-methyl-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbutanamide); (54)  Ketobemidone (including the optical and geometric isomers); (55)  Levomoramide; (56) Levophenacylmorphan; (57)  Meta-fluorofentanyl (N-3-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide); (58)  Meta-fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(3-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (59)  Methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (60)  4'-Methyl acetyl fentanyl (N-(1-(4-methylphenethyl)piperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylacetamide); (61)  2-methyl AP237 (1-2-methyl-4-3-phenylprop-2-en-1-yl)piperazin-1-yl)butan-1-one; (62)  3-Methylfentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (63)  3-Methylthiofentanyl (N-[3-methyl-1- (2-thienylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]-N-phenylpropanamide); (64)  Para-methoxyfuranyl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (65)  Metonitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-(2-(4-methoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine (metonitazene); (66)  Morpheridine; (67)  MPPP (1-methyl-4-phenyl-4-propionoxypiperidine); (68)  MT-45 (1-cyclohexyl-4-(1,2-diphenylethyl)piperazine); (69)  N-pyrrolidino etonitazene 2-4-ethoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1-2-pyrrolidin-1-yl)ethyl)-1H-benzimidazole, also known as etonitazepyne; (70)  Noracymethadol; (71)  Norlevorphanol; (72)  Normethadone; (73)  Norpipanone; (74)  Ocfentanil (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-2-methoxy-N- (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide); (75)  Ortho-Fluoroacryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acrylamide); (76)  Ortho-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide), also known as 2-fluorobutyryl fentanyl; (77)  Ortho-Fluorofentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as 2-fluorofentanyl; (78)  Ortho-fluorofuranyl fentanyl (N-2-fluorophenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (79)  Ortho-Fluoroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(2-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (80)  Ortho-Methyl acetylfentanyl (N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)acetamide), also known as 2-methyl acetylfentanyl; (81)  Ortho-Methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl (2-methoxy-N-(2-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl) acetamide), also known as 2-methyl methoxyacetyl fentanyl; (82)  Para-Chloroisobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-chlorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)isobutyramide); (83)  Para-Fluorobutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); (84)  Para-Fluorofentanyl (N-(4-fluorophenyl) -N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl]propanamide); (85)  Para-Fluoro furanyl fentanyl N-(4-fluorophenyl)-N- (1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)furan-2-carboxamide); (86)  Para-Methoxybutyryl fentanyl (N-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)butyramide); (87)  Para-methylcyclopropyl fentanyl (N-4-methylphenyl)-N-1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)cyclopropanecarboxamide); (88)  Para-Methylfentanyl (N-(4-methylphenyl)-N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)propionamide), also known as 4-methylfentanyl); (89)  PEPAP (1-(-2-phenethyl)-4-phenyl-4-acetoxypiperidine); (90)  Phenadoxone; (91)  Phenampromide; (92)  Phenomorphan; (93)  Phenoperidine; (94)  Phenyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylbenzamide), also known as benzoyl fentanyl; (95)  Piritramide; (96)  Proheptazine; (97)  Properidine; (98)  Propiram; (99)  Protonitazene N,N-diethyl-2-5-nitro-2-4-propoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine; (100)  Racemoramide; (101)  Tetrahydrofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenyltetrahydrofuran-2- carboxamide); (102)  Thiofentanyl (N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-thienyl)ethyl-4-piperidinyl]propanamide); (103)  Thiofuranyl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylthiophene-2-carboxamide), also known as 2-thiofuranyl fentanyl or thiophene fentanyl; (104)  Tilidine; (105)  Trimeperidine; (106)  U-47700, (3,4-dichloro-N- [2-(dimethylamino)cyclohexyl]-N-methylbenzamide); (107)  Valeryl fentanyl (N-(1-phenethylpiperidin-4-yl)-N-phenylpentanamide) * * *.; (108)  Butonitazene (2-2-4-butoxybenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol1-yl)-N,N-diethylethan-1-amine); (109)  Flunitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-2-4-fluorobenzyl)-5-nitro-1H-benzimidazol1-yl)ethan-1-amime); (110) Metodesnitazene (N,N-diethyl-2-2-4-methoxybenzyl)-1H-benzimidazol-1-yl)ethan-1-amine). (c)  Opium derivatives. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any of the following opium derivatives, their salts, isomers and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Acetorphine; (2) Acetyldihydrocodeine; (3)  Benzylmorphine; (4)  Codeine methylbromide; (5)  Codeine-N-Oxide; (6)  Cyprenorphine; (7)  Desomorphine; (8)  Dihydromorphine; (9)  Drotebanol; (10)  Etorphine (except hydrochloride salt); (11)  Heroin; (12)  Hydromorphinol; (13)  Methyldesorphine; (14) Methyldihydromorphine; (15) Monoacetylmorphine; (16)  Morphine methylbromide; (17)  Morphine methylsulfonate; (18)  Morphine-N-Oxide; (19)  Myrophine; (20)  Nicocodeine; (21)  Nicomorphine; (22)  Normorphine; (23)  Pholcodine; (24)  Thebacon. (d)  Hallucinogenic substances.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances, their salts, isomers (whether optical, positional, or geometric) and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of these salts, isomers and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Alpha-ethyltryptamine; (2)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; (3)  4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenethylamine; (4)  2,5-dimethoxyamphetamine; (5)  2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylamphetamine (DOET); (6)  2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylthiophenethylamine (2C-T-7); (7)  4-methoxyamphetamine; (8)  5-methoxy-3,4-methylenedioxy-amphetamine; (9)  4-methyl-2,5-dimethoxy-amphetamine; (10)  3,4-methylenedioxy amphetamine; (11)  3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA); (12)  3,4-methylenedioxy-N-ethylamphetamine (also known as N-ethyl-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine, N-ethyl MDA, MDE, MDEA); (13)  N-hydroxy-3,4-methylenedioxyamphetamine (also known as N-hydroxy MDA, N-OHMDA, and N-hydroxy-alpha-methyl-3,4(methylenedioxy)phenethylamine); (14)  3,4,5-trimethoxy amphetamine; (15)  5-methoxy-N,N-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT); (16)  Alpha-methyltryptamine (also known as AMT); (17)  Bufotenine; (18) Diethyltryptamine; (19) Dimethyltryptamine; (20)  5-methoxy-N,N-diisopropyltryptamine (5-MeO-DIPT); (21)  Ibogaine; (22)  Lysergic acid diethylamide (LSD); (23)  (A)  Marijuana (Hemp as defined and regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221 and Cannabidiol contained in a legend drug product approved by the Federal Food and Drug Administration or obtained under Section 41-29-136 are exempt under Schedule I); (B)  Hashish; (24)  Mescaline; (25)  Parahexyl; (26)  Peyote; (27)  N-ethyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (28)  N-methyl-3-piperidyl benzilate; (29)  Psilocybin; (30)  Psilocyn; (31) Tetrahydrocannabinols, meaning tetrahydrocannabinols contained in a plant of the genus Cannabis (cannabis plant), as well as the synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the cannabis plant, or in the resinous extractives of such plant, and/or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity to those substances contained in the plant such as the following: (A)  1 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol; (B)  6 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol; (C)  3,4 cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol. (Since nomenclature of these substances is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of atomic positions, are covered.) ("Tetrahydrocannabinols" excludes dronabinol and nabilone.)  For purposes of this paragraph, tetrahydrocannabinols do not include hemp or hemp products regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221. However, the following products are exempted from control: (i)  THC-containing industrial products made from cannabis stalks (e.g., paper, rope and clothing); (ii) Processed cannabis plant materials used for industrial purposes, such as fiber retted from cannabis stalks for use in manufacturing textiles or rope; (iii)  Animal feed mixtures that contain sterilized cannabis seeds and other ingredients (not derived from the cannabis plant) in a formula designed, marketed and distributed for nonhuman consumption; (iv)  Personal care products that contain oil from sterilized cannabis seeds, such as shampoos, soaps, and body lotions (if the products do not cause THC to enter the human body); (v)  Hemp as regulated under Sections 69-25-201 through 69-25-221; and (vi)  Any product derived from the hemp plant designed for human ingestion and/or consumption that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration; (32)  Phencyclidine; (33)  Ethylamine analog of phencyclidine (PCE); (34)  Pyrrolidine analog of phencyclidine (PHP, PCPy); (35)  Thiophene analog of phencyclidine; (36)  1-[1-(2-thienyl)cyclohexyl] pyrrolidine (TCPy); (37)  4-methylmethcathinone (mephedrone); (38)  3,4-methylenedioxypyrovalerone (MDPV); (39)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-ethylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-E); (40)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-methylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-D); (41)  2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-C); (42)  2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-I); or 2,5-dimethoxy-4-iodophenethylamine; (43)  2-[4-(ethylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-2); (44)  2-[4-(isopropylthio)-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl]ethanamine (2C-T-4); (45)  2-(2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)ethanamine (2C-H); (46)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-nitro-phenyl)ethanamine (2C-N); (47)  2-(2,5-dimethoxy-4-(n)-propylphenyl)ethanamine (2C-P); (48)  3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylcathinone(methylone); (49)  2-(4-bromo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25B-NBOMe; 2C-B-NBOMe; 25B; Cimbi-36); (50)  2-(4-chloro-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine (25C-NBOMe; 2C-C-NBOMe; 25C; Cimbi-82); (51)  2-(4-iodo-2,5-dimethoxyphenyl)-N-(2-methoxybenzyl)ethanamine or N-[(2-methoxyphenyl)methyl]ethanamine (25I-NBOMe; 2C-I-NBOMe; 25I; Cimbi-5); (52)  7-bromo-5-(2-chlorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1, 4-benzodiazepin-2-one (also known as Phenazepam); (53)  7-(2-chlorophenyl)-4-ethyl-13-methyl-3-thia-1,8, 11,12-tetraazatricyclo[8.3.0.0]trideca-2(6),4,7,10,12-pentaene (also known as Etizolam); (54)  Salvia divinorum; (55)  Synthetic cannabinoids.  Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of a synthetic cannabinoid found in any of the following chemical groups, whether or not substituted to any extent, or any of those groups which contain any synthetic cannabinoid salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, or salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation, including all synthetic cannabinoid chemical analogues in such groups: (A)  (6aR,10aR)-9-(hydroxymethyl)-6, 6-dimethyl-3-(2-methyloctan-2-yl)-6a,7,10,10a-tetrahydrobenzo[c] chromen-1-ol (also known as HU-210 or 1,1-dimethylheptyl-11-hydroxy-delta8-tetrahydrocannabinol); (B) Naphthoylindoles and naphthylmethylindoles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)indole or 1H-indol-3-yl-(1-naphthyl)methane, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent, or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (C) Naphthoylpyrroles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-(1-naphthoyl)pyrrole, whether or not substituted in the pyrrole ring to any extent, or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (D) Naphthylmethylindenes, being any compound structurally derived from 1-(1-naphthylmethyl)indene, whether or not substituted in the indene ring to any extent or in the naphthyl ring to any extent; (E) Phenylacetylindoles, being any compound structurally derived from 3-phenylacetylindole, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the phenyl ring to any extent; (F) Cyclohexylphenols, being any compound structurally derived from 2-(3-hydroxycyclohexyl)phenol, whether or not substituted in the cyclohexyl ring to any extent or in the phenolic ring to any extent; (G) Benzoylindoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the phenyl ring to any extent; (H) Adamantoylindoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or in the adamantoyl ring system to any extent; (I)  Tetrahydro derivatives of cannabinol and 3-alkyl homologues of cannabinol or of its tetrahydro derivatives, except where contained in cannabis or cannabis resin; (J)  3-Cyclopropylmethanone indole or 3-Cyclobutylmethanone indole or 3-Cyclopentylmethanone indole by substitution at the nitrogen atom of the indole ring, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the cyclopropyl, cyclobutyl or cyclopentyl rings to any extent; (K)  Quinolinyl ester indoles, being any compound structurally derived from 1H-indole-3carboxylic acid-8-quinolinyl ester, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent or the quinolone ring to any extent; (L)  3-carboxamide-1H-indazoles, whether or not substituted in the indazole ring to any extent and substituted to any degree on the carboxamide nitrogen and 3-carboxamide-1H-indoles, whether or not substituted in the indole ring to any extent and substituted to any degree on the carboxamide nitrogen; (M) Cycloalkanemethanone Indoles, whether or not substituted at the nitrogen atom on the indole ring, whether or not further substituted in the indole ring to any extent, whether or not substituted on the cycloalkane ring to any extent; (56)  Naphthalen-1-yl 1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxylate, also known as NM2201 or CBL2201; (57)  1-(5-fluoropentyl)-N-(2-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1H- pyrrolo[2,3-b]pyridine-3-carboxamide, also known as 5F-CUMYL-P7AICA or SGT-25; (58)  Methyl 2-(1-(4-fluorobutyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 4F-MDMB-BINACA or 4F-MDMB-BUTINACA); (59)  1-(4-methoxyphenyl)-N-methylpropan-2-amine, also known as para-methoxymethamphetamine or PMMA; (60)  Ethyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl) -1H-indazole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 5F-EDMB-PINACA; (61)  Methyl 2-(1-(5-fluoropentyl)-1H-indole-3-carboxamido)-3,3-dimethylbutanoate, also known as 5F-MDMB-PICA or 5F-MDMB-2201; (62)  N-(adamantan-1-yl)-1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide, also known as FUB-AKB48 or FUB-APINACA or AKB48 N-(4-fluorobenzyl); (63)  (1-(4-fluorobenzyl)-1H-indol-3-yl)(2,2,3,3-tetramethylcyclopropyl)methanone, also known as FUB-144; (64)  N-ethylhexedrone, also known as α-ethylaminohexanophenone or 2-(ethylamino)-1-phenylhexan-1-one; (65)  Alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone, also known as α-PHP or α-pyrrolidinohexanophenone or 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one); (66)  4-methyl-alpha-ethylaminopentiophenone, also known as 4-MEAP or 2-(ethylamino)-1-(4-methylphenyl)pentan-1-one); (67)  4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexiophenone, also known as MPHP or 4'-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinohexanophenone or 1-(4-methylphenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)hexan-1-one); (68)  Alpha-pyrrolidinoheptaphenone (also known as PV8; 1-phenyl-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)heptan-1-one); (69)  4'-chloro-alpha-pyrrolidinovalerophenone, also known as 4-chloro-α-PVP or 4'-chloro-α-pyrrolidinopentiophenone or 1-(4-chlorophenyl)-2-(pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one); (70)  2-(ethylamino)-2-(3-methoxyphenyl)cyclohexan-1-one, also known as methoxetamine or MXE; (71) Zipeprol (1-methoxy-3-[4-(2-methoxy-2-phenylethyl)piperazin-1-yl]-1-phenylpropan-2-ol); (72)  Eutylone (1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino)butan-1-one); * * *and (73)  ADBBUTINACA N-1-amino-3,3-dimethyl-1-oxobutan-2-yl)-1-butyl-1H-indazole-3-carboxamide * * *.; (74)  1-1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-dimethylamino)pentan-1-one(dipentylone; N,N-dimethylpentylone). (e)  Depressants. Unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule, any material, compound, mixture, or preparation which contains any quantity of the following substances having a depressant effect on the central nervous system, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation: (1)  Clonazolam, 6-(2-chlorophenyl)-1-methyl-8-nitro-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine; (2)  Flualprazolam, 8-chloro-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepine; (3)  Flubromazepam, 7-bromo-5-(2-fluorophenyl)-1,3-dihydro-2H-1,4-benzodiazepin-2-one; (4)  Flubromazolam, 8-bromo-6-(2-fluorophenyl)-1-methyl-4H-[1,2,4]triazolo[4,3-a][1,4]benzodiazepin; (5)  Gamma-hydroxybutyric acid (other names include:  GHB, gamma-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutyrate; 4-hydroxybutanoic acid; sodium oxybate; sodium oxybutyrate); (6)  Mecloqualone; (7)  Methaqualone. (f)  Stimulants.  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of the following central nervous system stimulants including optical salts, isomers and salts of isomers unless specifically excepted or unless listed in another schedule: (1)  Aminorex; (2)  Amineptine (7-[(10,11-dihydro-5H-dibenzo[a,d]cyclohepten-5-yl)amino]heptanoic acid); (3)  N-benzylpiperazine (also known as BZP and 1-benzylpiperazine); (4)  Cathinone; (5)  4,4'-Dimethylaminorex, also known as 4,4'-DMAR or 4,5-dihydro-4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-2-oxazolamine; 4-methyl-5-(4-methylphenyl)-4,5-dihydro-1,3-oxazol-2-amine); (6)  Fenethylline; (7)  Mesocarb (N-phenyl-N' -(3-(1-phenylpropan-2-yl)-1,2,3-oxadiazol-3- ium-5-yl)carbamimidate); (8)  Methcathinone; (9)  Methiopropamine (N-methyl-1-(thiophen-2-yl)propan-2-amine)); (10)  4-methylaminorex (also known as 2-amino-4-methyl-5-phenyl-2-oxazoline); (11)  N-ethylamphetamine; (12)  Any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of N,N-dimethylamphetamine. (Other names include:  N,N,-alpha-trimethyl-benzeneethanamine and N,N-alpha-trimethylphenethylamine); (13)  Synthetic cathinones.  (A)  Unless listed in another schedule, any compound other than bupropion that is structurally derived from 2-Amino-1-phenyl-1-propanone by modification in any of the following ways: (i) By substitution in the phenyl ring to any extent with alkyl, alkoxy, alkylenedioxy, haloalkyl or halide substituents, whether or not further substituted in the phenyl ring by one or more other univalent substituents; (ii) By substitution at the 3-position with an alkyl substituent; (iii) By substitution at the nitrogen atom with alkyl or dialkyl groups, or by inclusion of the nitrogen atom in a cyclic structure. (B)  The compounds covered in this paragraph (10) include, but are not limited to, any material, compound, mixture or preparation which contains any quantity of a synthetic cathinone found in any of the following compounds, whether or not substituted to any extent, or any of these compounds which contain any synthetic cathinone, or salts, isomers, or salts of isomers, whenever the existence of such salts, isomers or salts of isomers is possible, unless specifically excepted or listed in another schedule: (i)  4-methyl-N-ethylcathinone ("4-MEC"); (ii)  4-methyl-alpha-pyrrolidinopropiophenone ("4-MePPP"); (iii)  Alpha-pyrrolidinopentiophenone ("α-PVP"); (iv)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (methylamino)butan-1-one ("butylone"); (v)  2-(methylamino)-1-phenylpentan-1-one ("pentedrone"); (vi)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2- (methylamino)pentan-1-one ("pentylone"); (vii)  4-fluoro-N-methylcathinone ("4-FMC"); (viii)  3-fluoro-N-methylcathinone ("3-FMC"); (ix)  1-(naphthalen-2-yl)-2- (pyrrolidin-1-yl) pentan-1-one ("naphyrone"); (x)  Alpha-pyrrolidinobutiophenone ("α-PBP"); (xi)  1-(1,3-benzodioxol-5-yl)-2-(ethylamino) -pentan-1-one (N-ethylpentylone, ephylone); (14)  a-PiHP 4-methyl-1-phenyl-2-pyrrolidin-1-yl)pentan-1-one, also known as alpha-PiHP; * * *and (15)  3MMC 2-methylamino)-1-3-methylphenyl)propan-1-one, also known as 3-methylmethcathinone * * *.; and (16)  ethyl 2-phenyl-2-piperidin-2-yl)acetate). SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.